Maryland, session 2026, HB0434.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) SECTION 8–222 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE;
OR
Article – Real Property
8–222.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “ALGORITHMIC DEVICE” MEANS A DEVICE THAT USES ONE
OR MORE ALGORITHMS TO PERFORM CALCULATIONS OF DATA, INCLUDING DATA
CONCERNING LOCAL OR STATEWIDE RENT AMOUNTS BEING CHARGED TO TENANTS
BY LANDLORDS, TO:
1. ADVISE A LANDLORD ON THE AMOUNT OF RENT THAT
THE LANDLORD MAY CONSIDER CHARGING A TENANT; OR
2. RECOMMEND LEASE RENEWAL TERMS, IDEAL
OCCUPANCY LEVELS, OR OTHER LEASE TERMS AND CONDITIONS TO A RESIDENTIAL
RENTAL PROPERTY OWNER OR MANAGER.
(II) “ALGORITHMIC DEVICE” INCLUDES A PRODUCT THAT
INCORPORATES AN ALGORITHMIC DEVICE.
(III) “ALGORITHMIC DEVICE” DOES NOT INCLUDE:

HOUSE BILL 434 3
1. A PERIODIC REPORT PUBLISHED NOT MORE
FREQUENTLY THAN ONCE PER MONTH BY A TRADE ASSOCIATION THAT RECEIVES
RENTER DATA AND PUBLISHES IT IN AN AGGREGATED AND ANONYMOUS MANNER;
2. A PRODUCT USED FOR THE PURPOSE OF
ESTABLISHING RENT OR INCOME LIMITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE AFFORDABLE
HOUSING PROGRAM GUIDELINES OF A LOCAL GOVERNMENT, THE STATE, THE
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, OR ANOTHER POLITICAL SUBDIVISION; OR
3. INFORMATION COLLECTED BY AND SHARED AMONG
WHOLLY OWNED SUBSIDIARIES OF THE SAME PARENT ENTITY, OR AMONG ENTITIES
OR PROPERTIES OWNED BY THE SAME OWNER, ON HISTORICAL OR
CONTEMPORANEOUS PRICES, SUPPLY LEVELS, OR LEASE OR RENTAL CONTRACT
TERMINATION AND RENEWAL DATES AND RESIDENTIAL DWELLING UNITS.
(3) (I) “NONPUBLIC COMPETITOR DATA” MEANS INFORMATION
THAT IS:
1. NOT WIDELY AVAILABLE OR EASILY ACCESSIBLE TO
THE PUBLIC REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE INFORMATION IS ATTRIBUTABLE TO A
SPECIFIC COMPETITOR OR ANONYMIZED; AND
2. DERIVED FROM OR OTHERWISE PROVIDED TO A
PERSON BY ANOTHER PERSON THAT COMPETES IN THE SAME MARKET AS THE
PERSON, OR IN A RELATED MARKET.
(II) “NONPUBLIC COMPETITOR DATA” INCLUDES INFORMATION
REGARDING:
1. ACTUAL RENT PRICES;
2. OCCUPANCY RATES;
3. LEASE START AND END DATES; AND
4. OTHER SIMILAR INFORMATION.
(4) “RENT” MEANS THE FIXED, PERIODIC PAYMENTS THAT A TENANT
PAYS THE LANDLORD TO RESIDE IN A RENTAL UNIT.
(B) A LANDLORD MAY NOT EMPLOY, USE, OR RELY ON, OR CAUSE ANOTHER
TO EMPLOY, USE, OR RELY ON, AN ALGORITHMIC DEVICE THAT USES,
INCORPORATES, OR WAS TRAINED WITH NONPUBLIC COMPETITOR DATA TO SET:

HOUSE BILL 434
(1) THE AMOUNT OF RENT TO BE CHARGED FOR THE LEASE OF
RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY, INCLUDING DETERMINING ANY CHANGE IN RENT TO BE
CHARGED FOR THE RENEWAL OF A LEASE;
(2) LEASE RENEWAL TERMS;
(3) OCCUPANCY LEVELS; OR
(4) OTHER LEASE TERMS AND CONDITIONS.
(C) A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any landlord’s calculation of the amount of rent that the landlord charges for
the occupancy of a residential property under a rental agreement that is executed before
the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.